Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3505.02
Maximum value, defined.

Maximum value shall mean:

(1) For applicants eligible under section 77-3507, two hundred percent of the average assessed value of single-family residential property in the claimant's county of residence as determined in section 77-3506.02 or ninety-five thousand dollars, whichever is greater; and

(2) For applicants eligible under section 77-3508, two hundred twenty-five percent of the average assessed value of single-family residential property in the claimant's county of residence as determined in section 77-3506.02 or one hundred ten thousand dollars, whichever is greater.

Laws 1994, LB 902, § 29;

Laws 1995, LB 483, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1039, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 182, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 968, § 14;

Laws 2018, LB1089, § 5.
January 1, 2019